Mississippi, session 2026, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Each person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older, who is a recipient of benefits under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) or the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program and who is not employed shall be required to take the Test of Adult Basic Education (TABE).  If the recipient scores below the 12th grade level in any category of the TABE, the recipient must enroll in a program of study for the TABE at a community college in the state to become competent in those categories in which the recipient is deficient, and take the TABE again after completion of the program of study. If the recipient does not achieve a score at or above the 12th grade level in each category on the TABE when taking it for the second time, the recipient must again enroll in a program of study for the TABE at a community college in the state and retake the TABE until the recipient achieves a score at or above the 12th grade level in each category on the TABE. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.